Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-208.07
Insurance companies; organization; rules and regulations.

The Director of Insurance shall have authority to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to regulate all other matters in connection with the organization of domestic insurers for the purpose of protecting the public or preventing fraud.

Laws 1957, c. 178, § 8, p. 615;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 54.